Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5763YH (2) 91 ms/md H.F. 2208 Section 1. Section 441.21, subsection 14, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0d. Beginning with valuations established on 3 or after January 1, 2027, a single-family home that is owned by 4 the titleholder of more than ten single-family homes in Iowa 5 shall not be classified as residential property under this 6 subsection and shall be classified as commercial property. For 7 purposes of this paragraph, âsingle-family homeâ means a parcel 8 that is used or intended for human habitation containing one 9 dwelling unit. 10